California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
“Wages” does not include the payment to, or on behalf of, an employee for moving expenses, if at the time of the payment it is reasonable to believe that a corresponding deduction from income is allowable to the employee under Section 217 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

938.

(a) “Wages” does not include any payment or series of payments by an employer to an employee or any of his or her dependents which is paid:

(1) Upon or after the termination of an employee’s employment relationship because of death or retirement for disability, and

(2) Under a plan established by the employer which makes provision for his or her employees generally or a class or classes of his or her employees, or for the employees or class or classes of employees and their dependents.

(b) This section shall not apply to any payment or series of payments which would have been paid if the employee’s employment relationship had not been terminated as prescribed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

938.3.

“Wages” does not include any payment made, or benefit furnished to, or for the benefit of, an employee, for any of the following:

(a) An educational assistance program if, at the time of payment or the furnishing, it is reasonable to believe that the employee will be able to exclude the payment or benefit from income under Section 127 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) A dependent care assistance program if, at the time of payment or the furnishing, it is reasonable to believe that the employee will be able to exclude the
 payment or benefit from income under Section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Any benefit provided to or on behalf of an employee if at the time the benefit is provided it is reasonable to believe that the employee will be able to exclude the benefit from income under Section 74(c), 117, or 132 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) Any benefit under a cafeteria plan, as described in Section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the benefit is excludable from wages pursuant to any other provision of this article, except Section 930.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 647, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

938.4.

“Wages” does not include any payment made, or benefit furnished to, or for the benefit of, an employee under Section 105(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amounts expended for medical care, as amended by Section 1004(d)(1) of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 17, Sec. 4.   (AB 36)   Effective April 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

938.5.

“Wages” does not include any payment received by a member of the National Guard or reserve component of the armed forces for inactive duty training, annual training, or emergency state active duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

938.7.

“Wages,” does not include any payment made by an employer to a survivor, or the estate of a former employee, after the calendar year in which the employee died.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 37, Sec. 1.   Effective May 7, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

939.

Types of payments excluded from the definition of wages by Sections 931, 931.5, 933, 934, 935, 936, 937, 938, 938.1, 938.3, and 938.7 shall be excluded from the definition of wages only during the time that the respective type or types of payments set forth in those sections are similarly excluded from the definition of wages contained in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

940.

For the purposes of this section, of Sections 977 and 977.5 to the extent specified by those sections, and of Sections 1026, 1088, 1280, 1281, 1282, 2652, 2654, 2655, and 2657, “wages” means taxable wages as well as wages which would be taxable except for the limitations on taxable wages provided under Sections 930 and 985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1275, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contribution Rates [976. - 995.]

976.

Employer contributions to the Unemployment Fund shall accrue and become payable by every employer, except an employer as defined by Section 676, for each calendar year with respect to wages paid for employment. The contributions are due and shall be paid to the department for the Unemployment Fund by each employer in accordance with this division and shall not be deducted in whole or in part from the wages of individuals in his employ.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

976.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in addition to other contributions required by this division, every employer, except an employer to which subdivision (c) is applicable, may submit a voluntary unemployment insurance contribution for the purpose of redetermining its unemployment insurance contribution rate. No redetermination of a contribution rate shall be made unless the voluntary contribution is submitted as required in subdivision (c) of Section 1110. No redetermination shall reduce an employer’s unemployment insurance
 contribution rate by more than three rates as provided in Section 977.

(b) This section shall not be operative in calendar years in which Contribution Rate Schedules E and F in Section 977 are in effect, or in calendar years to which the emergency solvency surcharge provided in Section 977.5 is in effect.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An employer not eligible for a contribution rate other than that provided pursuant to Section 982 or subdivision (c) of Section 977.

(2) An employer with a negative reserve account balance on the computation date.

(3) An employer who was notified prior to September 1 of any unpaid amount owed to the department which is not the
 subject of a timely petition for reassessment pending before the appeals board on September 30 preceding the year to which a contribution rate is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

976.6.

In addition to other contributions required by this division, every employer, except an employer defined by Section 676, 684, or 685, and except an employer that has elected an alternate method of financing its liability for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 801), or Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3, shall pay into the Employment Training Fund contributions at the rate of 0.1 percent of wages specified in Section 930. The contributions shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time
 as any contributions required under Sections 977 and 977.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 18.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

976.8.

(a) Section 976.6 does not apply to any employer who has a negative reserve account balance on the computation date. 

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to an employer assigned the maximum rate pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 977.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 827, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if, as of the computation date, the employer’s net balance of reserve equals or exceeds that percentage of his or her average base payroll which appears on any line in column 1 of the following table, but is less than that percentage of his or her average base payroll which appears on the same line in column 2 of that table, his or her contribution rate shall be the figure appearing on that same line in the appropriate schedule, as defined in subdivision (b), which shall be a percentage of the wages
 specified in Section 930. Reserve Ratio
Column ColumnContribution Rate
 SchedulesLine1 2AAABCDEF01
 02
 03
 04
 05
 06
 07
 08
 09
 10less than –20
–20 to –18
–18 to –16
–16 to –14
–14 to –12
–12 to –11
–11 to –10
–10 to –09
–09 to –08
–08 to –075.4
 5.2
 5.1
 5.0
 4.9
 4.8
 4.7
 4.6
 4.5
 4.45.4
 5.3
 5.2
 5.1
 5.0
 4.9
 4.8
 4.7
 4.6
 4.55.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.3
 5.3
 5.2
 5.1
 5.1
 4.9
 4.85.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.3
 5.3
 5.2
 5.15.4
5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.35.4
 5.4
 5.4

 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.45.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.411
 12
 13
 14
 15–07 to –06
–06 to –05
–05 to –04
–04 to –03
–03 to –024.3
 4.2
 4.1
 4.0
 3.94.4
 4.3
 4.2

 4.1
 4.04.7
 4.6
 4.5
 4.4
 4.35.0
 4.9
 4.8
 4.7
 4.65.3
 5.2
 5.1
 5.0
 4.95.4
 5.4
 5.3
 5.3
 5.25.4
5.4
 5.4
 5.4
 5.416
 17
 18
 19
 20–02 to –01
–01 to 00
 00 to 01
 01 to 02
 02 to 033.8
 3.7
 3.4
 3.2
 3.03.9
 3.8
 3.6
 3.4
 3.24.2
 4.1
 3.9
 3.7
 3.54.5
 4.4
 4.2
 4.0
 3.84.8
 4.7
 4.5
 4.3

 4.15.1
 5.0
 4.8
 4.6
 4.45.4
 5.4
 5.1
 4.9
 4.721
 22
 23
 24
 25 03 to 04
 04 to 05
 05 to 06
 06 to 07
 07 to 082.8
 2.6
 2.4

 2.2
 2.03.0
 2.8
 2.6
 2.4
 2.23.3
 3.1
 2.9
 2.7
 2.53.6
 3.4
 3.2
 3.0
 2.83.9
 3.7
 3.5
 3.3
 3.14.2
 4.0
 3.8
 3.6
 3.44.5
 4.3
 4.1
 3.9
 3.726
 27
 28
 29
 30 08 to 09
 09 to 10
 10 to 11
 11 to 12
 12 to 131.8
 1.6
 1.4
 1.2
 1.02.0
 1.8
 1.6
 1.4
 1.22.3
 2.1
 1.9
 1.7
 1.52.6
 2.4
 2.2
 2.0
 1.82.9
 2.7
 2.5
 2.3
 2.13.2
 3.0
 2.8
 2.6
 2.43.5
 3.3
 3.1
 2.9
 2.731
 32
 33
 34 13 to 14
 14 to 15
 15 to 16
 16 to 170.8
 0.7
 0.6
 0.51.0
 0.9
 0.8
 0.71.3
 1.1
 1.0
 0.91.6
 1.4
 1.2
 1.11.9
 1.7
 1.5
 1.32.2
 2.0
 1.8
 1.62.5
 2.3
 2.1
 1.935
 36
 37

 38 17 to 18
 18 to 19
 19 to 20
20 or more0.4
 0.3
 0.2
 0.10.6
 0.5
 0.4
 0.30.8
 0.7
 0.6
 0.51.0
 0.9
 0.8
 0.71.2
 1.1
 1.0
 0.91.4
 1.3
 1.2
 1.11.7
 1.5
 1.4
 1.3(b) (1) Whenever the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is greater than 1.8 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment subject to this part paid during the 12-month period ending upon the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to employment at the rates specified in Schedule AA.

(2) Whenever
 the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is equal to or less than 1.8 percent and greater than 1.6 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment subject to this part paid during the 12-month period ending upon the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to employment at the rates specified in Schedule A.

(3) Whenever the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is equal to or less than 1.6 percent and greater than 1.4 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment subject to this part paid during the 12-month period ending upon the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to employment at the rates specified in Schedule B.

(4) Whenever the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is equal to or less than 1.4 percent and greater than 1.2 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment subject to this part paid during the 12-month period ending upon the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to employment at the rates specified in Schedule C.

(5) Whenever the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is equal to or less than 1.2 percent and greater than 1.0 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment subject to this part paid during the 12-month period ending upon the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to
 employment at the rates specified in Schedule D.

(6) Whenever the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is equal to or less than 1.0 percent and greater than or equal to 0.8 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment subject to this part paid during the 12-month period ending upon the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to employment at the rates specified in Schedule E.

(7) Whenever the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is less than 0.8 percent and greater than or equal to 0.6 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment subject to this part paid during the 12-month period ending upon the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the
 succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to employment at the rates specified in Schedule F.

(c) For each rating period beginning on or after January 1, 2005, in which an employer obtains or attempts to obtain a more favorable rate of contributions under this section due to deliberate ignorance, reckless disregard, fraud, intent to evade, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, the director shall assign the maximum contribution rate plus 2 percent for each applicable rating period, the current rating period, and the subsequent rating period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 827, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

977.5.

Whenever the balance in the Unemployment Fund on September 30 of any calendar year is less than 0.6 percent of the wages (as defined by Section 940) in employment, subject to this part, paid during the 12-month period ending on the computation date, employers shall pay into the Unemployment Fund contributions for the succeeding calendar year upon all wages with respect to employment at an emergency solvency surcharge rate. The emergency solvency surcharge rate shall be 1.15 times the rate the employer would have paid in Schedule F of subdivision (a) of Section
 977, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

979.

On or before January 10 of each calendar year, the director shall prepare a statement based on records of the department declaring which of the employer tax schedules contained in Section 977 shall be in effect for that calendar year and whether the emergency solvency surcharge pursuant to Section 977.5 shall be added. The statement shall be a public record and shall be final and binding for that calendar year. The statement shall include the official tabulation of wages in subject employment made by the department for the purpose of Sections 977 and 977.5, a summary of the data upon which that tabulation was based, and the
 sources from which those data were obtained, and shall further include a summary of the data upon which the computation of the balance in the Unemployment Fund was based, and their source. The director’s action under Sections 977, 977.5, and this section shall not constitute an authorized regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1275, Sec. 9.   Effective September 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

980.

(a) In determining the balance in the Unemployment Fund for the purpose of Sections 977 and 977.5, there shall be excluded all of the following:

(1) Any amount credited to this state’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund pursuant to Section 903 of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, which has been appropriated for expenses of administration other than for capital assets, whether or not that amount has been withdrawn from that fund.

(2) Any unexpended advance from the federal unemployment account
 in the Unemployment Trust Fund received in accordance with Section 323 of this division and Title XII of the federal Social Security Act, as amended.

(3) Any amount paid in advance into the Unemployment Fund by an employer under any type of coverage pursuant to which reimbursement of benefits is permitted or required in lieu of the contributions required of employers.

(4) Any amount paid in advance into the Unemployment Fund by the federal government under any federal law that requires or permits this state to pay benefits from the Unemployment Fund and provides for advances by the federal government for reimbursement of all or part of those benefits.

(b) In determining the balance in the Unemployment Fund for the purpose of Sections 977 and 977.5, there shall also be excluded any estimated or other contributions not
 legally due and payable with respect to the final calendar quarter of the calendar year, except any payment of contributions made under Sections 976.5 and 1137 and except any payment of contributions by employers terminating business during any calendar quarter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1146, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

980.5.

In determining the balance in the Unemployment Fund for the purpose of Sections 977 and 977.5, there shall be included both of the following:

(a) The unreimbursed balance of all benefits paid from the Unemployment Fund to claimants when those benefits are based upon wages in employment under any type of coverage pursuant to which reimbursement of benefits is permitted or required in lieu of the contributions required of employers, whether or not the director has certified the benefits to the employer as due or payable.

(b) The unreimbursed balance of all benefits paid from the Unemployment Fund to claimants when, and to the extent that, the benefits are subject to reimbursement by the federal government under any federal law that requires or permits this state to pay benefits from the Unemployment Fund and provides for reimbursement by the federal government of all or part of those benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1275, Sec. 11.   Effective September 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

981.

In determining wages in employment, for the purpose of Sections 977 and 977.5, there shall be excluded all wages paid in employment under any type of coverage pursuant to which reimbursement of benefits is permitted or required in lieu of the contributions required of employers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1275, Sec. 12.   Effective September 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

982.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no employer shall be eligible for a contribution rate of more or less than 3.4 percent for any rating period unless his or her reserve account has been subject to benefit charges during the period of 12 complete consecutive calendar quarters ending on the computation date for that rating period and he or she is qualified under Sections 977 and 977.5.

(b) No new employer shall be eligible for a contribution rate of more or less than 3.4
 percent unless his or her reserve account has been subject to benefit charges during the period of 12 complete consecutive calendar months ending on the computation date and the new employer is qualified under Sections 977 and 977.5.

(c) For the purposes of this section “new employer” means any of the following:

(1) An employer who first qualifies as an employer after the 1969 calendar year, and whose account is continuously subject to benefit charges from the date of first chargeability, except that a successor employer under Section 1051 is not a new employer if the successor applies for or obtains the transfer of the reserve account or part thereof of a predecessor who is not a new employer.

(2) An employer whose entire reserve account has been transferred to a successor under Article 5 (commencing with Section
 1051) of Chapter 4 of this part.

(3) An employer whose reserve account has been canceled pursuant to Section 1029.

(d) Section 905 applies to a new employer, except that for the purposes of this section “average base payroll” means:

(1) The payroll in the calendar year immediately preceding the computation date for a new employer with a payroll only in that calendar year.

(2) The quotient obtained by dividing by two the total amount of taxable wages paid by a new employer during the most recent period of two consecutive calendar years immediately preceding the computation date, for a new employer with a payroll only in each of, or only in the first of, the two consecutive calendar years.

(e) The contribution rate of an employer, for any period prior to January 1, 1988, shall not be changed, other than by the provisions of Sections 977 and 977.5, when the director makes a determination, pursuant to Section 135.1 or 135.2, because of arrangements entered into or business activities conducted between January 1, 1984, and January 1, 1986.

(f) This section does not apply to an employer assigned the maximum rate pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 977.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 827, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

984.

(a) (1) Each worker shall pay worker contributions at the rate determined by the director pursuant to this section with respect to wages, as defined by Sections 926, 927, and 985. On or before October 31 of each calendar year, the director shall prepare a statement, which shall be a public record, declaring the rate of worker contributions for the calendar year and shall notify promptly all employers of employees covered for disability insurance of the rate.

(2) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the rate of worker contributions for calendar year 1987 and for each subsequent calendar year shall be 1.30 times the amount disbursed from the Disability Fund during the 12-month
 period ending September 30 and immediately preceding the calendar year for which the rate is to be effective, less the amount in the Disability Fund on that September 30, with the resulting figure divided by total wages paid pursuant to Sections 926, 927, and 985 during the same 12-month period, and then rounded to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent.

(B) The director shall increase the rate of worker contributions by .08 percent for the 2004 and 2005 calendar years to cover the initial cost of family temporary disability insurance benefits provided in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3300) of Part 2.

(3) The rate of worker contributions shall not exceed 1.5 percent or be less than 0.1 percent. The rate of worker contributions shall not decrease from the rate in the previous year by more than two-tenths of 1 percent.

(b) Worker contributions required under Sections 708 and 708.5 shall be at a rate determined by the director to reimburse the Disability Fund for unemployment compensation disability benefits paid and estimated to be paid to all employers and self-employed individuals covered by those sections. On or before November 30th of each calendar year, the director shall prepare a statement, which shall be a public record, declaring the rate of contributions for the succeeding calendar year for all employers and self-employed individuals covered under Sections 708 and 708.5 and shall notify promptly the employers and self-employed individuals of the rate. The rate shall be determined by dividing the estimated benefits and administrative costs paid in the prior year by the product of the annual remuneration deemed to have been received under Sections 708 and 708.5 and the estimated number of persons who were covered at any time in the prior year. The resulting rate shall be rounded to the next higher
 one-hundredth percentage point. The rate may also be reduced or increased by a factor estimated to maintain as nearly as practicable a cumulative zero balance in the funds contributed pursuant to Sections 708 and 708.5. Estimates made pursuant to this subdivision may be made on the basis of statistical sampling, or another method determined by the director.

(c) The director’s action in determining a rate under this section shall not constitute an authorized regulation.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and except as provided in paragraph (2), the director may, at the director’s discretion, increase or decrease, by not to exceed 0.1 percent, the rate of worker contributions determined pursuant to subdivision (a), up to a maximum worker contribution rate of 1.5 percent, if the director determines the adjustment is necessary to reimburse the Disability
 Fund for disability benefits paid or estimated to be paid to individuals covered by this section or to prevent the accumulation of funds in excess of those needed to maintain an adequate fund balance.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for the 2004, 2005, and 2006 calendar years, the director may not decrease the rate of worker contributions, regardless of whether the director determines that a decrease is necessary to prevent the accumulation of funds in excess of those needed to maintain the adequacy of the Disability Fund during program implementation.

(e) The amendment to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 24, Sec. 35.   (SB 83)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

984.5.

(a) Effective January 1, 1994, the director shall prepare a statement on or before November 30 of each calendar year, which shall be a public record, declaring the rate of contributions of the succeeding calendar year for all employers and self-employed individuals covered under Section 708 or 708.5 and shall notify promptly the employers and self-employed individuals of the rate. For calendar years 1994 to 1996, inclusive, worker contributions required under Section 708 or 708.5 shall be at a rate determined by the director to reimburse the
 Disability Fund for the sum of estimated administrative costs due to those sections and unemployment compensation disability benefits estimated to be paid to all employers and self-employed individuals covered by those sections. The rate shall be determined by dividing the sum of the benefits expected to be paid in the following calendar year and the administrative costs expected to be incurred under Section 708 or 708.5 during that calendar year by earnings estimated to be reported under those sections for that same calendar year. The resulting rate shall be rounded to the next higher one-hundredth percentage point. This rate may also be reduced or increased by a factor estimated to maintain as nearly as practicable a cumulative zero balance in funds contributed pursuant to Section 708 or 708.5.

For calendar year 1997, and each calendar year thereafter, the rate established each November 30 shall be determined by multiplying the current year’s rate by the ratio of
 1.10 times the current year disbursements divided by contributions for the same period, under Sections 708 and 708.5. If in any calendar year the cumulative balance of contributions minus disbursements equals or exceeds 20 percent of annual disbursements, the contribution rate for the succeeding year shall be adjusted to a level necessary to maintain revenues at no more than 20 percent over annual disbursements. If legislation is enacted necessitating adjustments in the benefit levels for employers and self-employed individuals covered under Section 708 or 708.5, the rate may be adjusted by a factor estimated to provide that funds contributed pursuant to Section 708 or 708.5 cover disbursements pursuant to these sections.

For the purpose of this subdivision, disbursements are defined as the sum of unemployment compensation disability benefits paid to employers and self-employed individuals covered under Section 708 or 708.5, plus administrative costs related to
 those sections. Estimates made pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for public inspection.

(b) The director’s action in determining a rate under this section shall not constitute an authorized regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 747, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

985.

(a) Section 984 shall not apply to that part of the remuneration which, after remuneration with respect to employment equal to four times the maximum weekly benefit for each calendar year specified in Section 2655 multiplied by 13 and divided by 55 percent has been paid to an individual by an employer, is paid to the individual by the employer.

(b) This section shall not apply with respect to wages paid on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 196, Sec. 25.   (SB 143)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

986.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law in this state to the contrary, each employer shall:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, withhold in trust the amount of his workers’ contributions from their wages at the time the wages are paid, shall show the deduction on his payroll records, and shall furnish each worker with a statement in writing showing the amount which has been deducted, in such form and at such times as may be prescribed.

(2) Hold in trust the amount of his workers’ contributions, at
 the time their wages are paid, where he undertakes or agrees to pay without deduction from the wages of his workers the amount of worker contributions required of his workers under this division.

(b) Each employer shall transmit all such contributions withheld or held in trust to the department for the Disability Fund, in addition to his own contributions for the Unemployment Fund, pursuant to authorized regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

987.

Each employer shall be liable for any and all contributions required to be made by his workers on account of wages which he has paid to them regardless of whether or not he has deducted the contributions from the workers’ wages at the time they were paid, but no employer shall be liable for worker contributions required on behalf of himself or of any of his employees with respect to wages paid while there is in effect at the time the wages were paid a rule or regulation or interpretation of the director or of the department that such wages were not subject to such contributions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

987.7.

(a) If the worker contributions required in any one month to be made because of the receipt of cash tips and cash gratuities exceed the wages of the worker under the control of the employer, the worker may furnish the employer, on or before the 10th day of the following month, or, if the amounts are estimated, on or before the last day of the month following the calendar quarter, an amount equal to the excess.

(b) If the worker contributions required by Section 984 with respect
 to cash tips and cash gratuities exceed the amount of worker contributions that can be collected by the employer from the wages of the worker, the excess shall be paid by the worker, except as provided by Section 1088.6. The worker shall pay the excess to the department within 30 days from his or her receipt of the written statement furnished by his or her employer pursuant to Section 1088.6. If the worker fails to pay the excess within the time required by this subdivision, the director may make an assessment for the excess and shall give the worker a written notice of the assessment. Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) with respect to the assessment of contributions and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701) with respect to the collection of contributions shall apply to the recovery of amounts under this subdivision.

(c) The director may offset amounts assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) against any refund payable to the worker under
 Section 1176.5 or against any amount of disability benefits to which he or she may become entitled under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) within any of the following periods:

(1) The current disability benefit period.

(2) One year from the beginning date of any disability benefit period that begins during the three-year period next succeeding the service of notice of the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

988.

In case of the insolvency or bankruptcy of an employer, contributions by workers, payable as provided in this article, shall not be considered any part of the employer’s assets and shall be paid to the director prior to the payment of any other claim against the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 175.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

989.

The annual tax rate or contribution rate which under this division is determined to apply to any particular employee or any particular employer, or group of employees or group of employers, shall be made public and available for public inspection but in no case shall the amount of tax paid by any employee or employer, or group of employees or group of employers, be disclosed to the public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

990.

In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent ($0.005) or more, in which case it shall be increased to one cent ($0.01).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

991.

(a) Any contributions paid to the Unemployment Fund or Disability Fund either with respect to wages on which contributions previously have been paid in error and without negligence on the part of the employing unit to another state having an unemployment compensation law, or with respect to wages on which contributions computed under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act previously have been paid in error and without negligence on the part of the employing unit to an agency of the federal government, shall be deemed for the purposes of this division to have been paid to the department at the time of the erroneous payment to the other state or to the federal
 agency, if payment is made to the department by the employing unit within 30 days after the employing unit is given notice pursuant to Section 1206 by the director of the determination that payment shall be made to the department. The 30-day period for payment may be extended by the director for good cause for a period not to exceed an additional 90 days.

(b) Any contributions paid to the Unemployment Fund or Disability Fund with respect to wages on which contributions computed under this division previously have been paid in error and without negligence on the part of the employing unit to an admitted disability insurer, to trustees administering a voluntary plan for the employing unit, to a self-insured plan of the employing unit, to another agency of this state, or to an agency of the federal government shall be deemed, solely to the extent of the amount of contributions previously paid in error and without negligence, for the purposes of
 this division to have been paid to the department at the time of the erroneous payment to the admitted disability insurer, to trustees administering a voluntary plan for the employing unit, to a self-insured plan of the employing unit, to another agency of this state, or to the federal agency, if payment is made to the department by the employing unit within 30 days after the employing unit is given notice pursuant to Section 1206 by the director of the determination that payment shall be made to the department. The 30-day period for payment may be extended by the director for good cause for a period not to exceed an additional 90 days. As used in this subdivision “paid” includes credits made to a self-insured plan of the employing unit. With respect to payments by an employing unit to an admitted disability insurer, to trustees administering a voluntary plan for the employing unit, or to a self-insured plan of the employing unit, this subdivision shall apply only if one or more of the following conditions
 are met:

(1) At the time of payment the employing unit has or prior to the time of payment had an approved voluntary plan with the recipient of the payment.

(2) Prior to the time of payment the employing unit had applied to the department for a voluntary plan which was subsequently approved by the department.

(3) At the time of payment the employing unit is a subsidiary or affiliate of an employing unit having an approved voluntary plan.

(4) At the time of payment the employing unit believed that a voluntary plan had been acquired pursuant to Section 3254.5.

(c) If payment is not made within the 30-day period or within the period for which an extension is granted, this section shall not
 apply and Article 7 (commencing with Section 1110), Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126), and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701), with respect to the payment of reported contributions, and the assessment and collection of contributions shall apply.

(d) If the director finds that the collection of any contributions will be jeopardized by delay this section shall not apply and the director may make a jeopardy assessment and collect the contributions pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126), and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------

992.

During such time as the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is amended so that employers are allowed, against the tax imposed by Section 3301 of that act, credits amounting to 100 percent of such tax on account of contributions paid under this division, then the additional amount of contributions provided for by Section 993 shall be required to be paid into the Unemployment Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2153.   Section operative as prescribed in Section 994.)
-------------------------------------------

993.

Every employer who is subject to the tax provided for by Section 3301 of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, shall, subject to Section 992, pay into the Unemployment Fund in addition to the amounts required by other provisions of this division an amount equal to five-tenths of 1 percent, or such other percentage as applies for a calendar year pursuant to Section 6157 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, of all wages paid by him or her in employment and included in the measure of the contributions allowed as the credit against the
 tax imposed by Section 3301 of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.   Section operative as prescribed in Section 994.)
-------------------------------------------

994.

Sections 992 and 993 shall not become operative unless the Secretary of Labor certifies that they are in conformity with the provisions of Title III of the Social Security Act and Sections 3302, 3303, and 3304 of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

995.
